Connecticut, session 2026, HB05436.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 53a-3 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
2 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
3 October 1, 2026):
4 Except where different meanings are expressly specified, the
5 following terms have the following meanings when used in this title:
6 (1) "Person" means a human being, and, where appropriate, a public
7 or private corporation, a limited liability company, an unincorporated
8 association, a partnership, a government or a governmental
9 instrumentality;
10 (2) "Possess" means to have physical possession or otherwise to
11 exercise dominion or control over tangible property;
12 (3) "Physical injury" means impairment of physical condition or pain;
LCO No. 2344 1 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
13 (4) "Serious physical injury" means physical injury which creates a
14 substantial risk of death, or which causes serious disfigurement, serious
15 impairment of health or serious loss or impairment of the function of
16 any bodily organ;
17 (5) "Deadly physical force" means physical force which can be
18 reasonably expected to cause death or serious physical injury;
19 (6) "Deadly weapon" means any weapon, whether loaded or
20 unloaded, from which a shot may be discharged, or a switchblade knife,
21 gravity knife, billy, blackjack, bludgeon, or metal knuckles. The
22 definition of "deadly weapon" in this subdivision shall be deemed not
23 to apply to section 29-38 or 53-206 and does not include an electronic
24 defense weapon when used by a peace officer;
25 (7) "Dangerous instrument" means any instrument, article or
26 substance which, under the circumstances in which it is used or
27 attempted or threatened to be used, is capable of causing death or
28 serious physical injury, and includes a "vehicle" as that term is defined
29 in this section and includes a dog that has been commanded to attack,
30 except a dog owned by a law enforcement agency of the state or any
31 political subdivision thereof or of the federal government when such
32 dog is in the performance of its duties under the direct supervision, care
33 and control of an assigned law enforcement officer;
34 (8) "Vehicle" means a "motor vehicle" as defined in section 14-1, a
35 snowmobile, any aircraft, or any vessel equipped for propulsion by
36 mechanical means or sail;
37 (9) "Peace officer" means a member of the Division of State Police
38 within the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection or
39 an organized local police department, a chief inspector or inspector in
40 the Division of Criminal Justice, a state marshal while exercising
41 authority granted under any provision of the general statutes, a judicial
42 marshal in the performance of the duties of a judicial marshal, a
43 conservation officer or special conservation officer, as defined in section
LCO No. 2344 2 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
44 26-5, a constable who performs criminal law enforcement duties, a
45 special policeman appointed under section 29-18, 29-18a, 29-18b or 29-
46 19, an adult probation officer, an official of the Department of Correction
47 authorized by the Commissioner of Correction to make arrests in a
48 correctional institution or facility, any investigator in the investigations
49 unit of the office of the State Treasurer, an inspector of motor vehicles in
50 the Department of Motor Vehicles, who is certified under the provisions
51 of sections 7-294a to 7-294e, inclusive, a United States marshal or deputy
52 marshal, any special agent of the federal government authorized to
53 enforce the provisions of Title 21 of the United States Code, or a member
54 of a law enforcement unit of the Mashantucket Pequot Tribe or the
55 Mohegan Tribe of Indians of Connecticut created and governed by a
56 memorandum of agreement under section 47-65c who is certified as a
57 police officer by the Police Officer Standards and Training Council
58 pursuant to sections 7-294a to 7-294e, inclusive;
59 (10) "Firefighter" means any agent of a municipality whose duty it is
60 to protect life and property therein as a member of a duly constituted
61 fire department whether professional or volunteer;
62 (11) A person acts "intentionally" with respect to a result or to conduct
63 described by a statute defining an offense when his conscious objective
64 is to cause such result or to engage in such conduct;
65 (12) A person acts "knowingly" with respect to conduct or to a
66 circumstance described by a statute defining an offense when he is
67 aware that his conduct is of such nature or that such circumstance exists;
68 (13) A person acts "recklessly" with respect to a result or to a
69 circumstance described by a statute defining an offense when he is
70 aware of and consciously disregards a substantial and unjustifiable risk
71 that such result will occur or that such circumstance exists. The risk
72 must be of such nature and degree that disregarding it constitutes a
73 gross deviation from the standard of conduct that a reasonable person
74 would observe in the situation;
LCO No. 2344 3 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
75 (14) A person acts with "criminal negligence" with respect to a result
76 or to a circumstance described by a statute defining an offense when he
77 fails to perceive a substantial and unjustifiable risk that such result will
78 occur or that such circumstance exists. The risk must be of such nature
79 and degree that the failure to perceive it constitutes a gross deviation
80 from the standard of care that a reasonable person would observe in the
81 situation;
82 (15) "Machine gun" means a weapon of any description, irrespective
83 of size, by whatever name known, loaded or unloaded, from which a
84 number of shots or bullets may be rapidly or automatically discharged
85 from a magazine with one continuous pull of the trigger and includes a
86 submachine gun;
87 (16) "Rifle" means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or
88 remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or
89 redesigned and made or remade to use the energy of the explosive in a
90 fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a rifled
91 bore for each single pull of the trigger;
92 (17) "Shotgun" means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or
93 remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or
94 redesigned and made or remade to use the energy of the explosive in a
95 fixed shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a number of ball
96 shot or a single projectile for each single pull of the trigger;
97 (18) "Pistol" or "revolver" means any firearm having a barrel less than
98 twelve inches;
99 (19) "Firearm" means any sawed-off shotgun, machine gun, rifle,
100 shotgun, pistol, revolver, major firearm component, unfinished frame
101 or lower receiver, as defined in section 53-206j, as amended by this act,
102 or other weapon, whether loaded or unloaded from which a shot may
103 be discharged;
104 (20) "Electronic defense weapon" means a weapon which by
LCO No. 2344 4 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
105 electronic impulse or current is capable of immobilizing a person
106 temporarily, including a stun gun or other conductive energy device;
107 (21) "Martial arts weapon" means a nunchaku, kama, kasari-fundo,
108 octagon sai, tonfa or chinese star;
109 (22) "Employee of an emergency medical service organization" means
110 an ambulance driver, emergency medical technician or paramedic as
111 defined in section 19a-175;
112 (23) "Railroad property" means all tangible property owned, leased
113 or operated by a railroad carrier including, but not limited to, a right-of-
114 way, track, roadbed, bridge, yard, shop, station, tunnel, viaduct, trestle,
115 depot, warehouse, terminal or any other structure or appurtenance or
116 equipment owned, leased or used in the operation of a railroad carrier
117 including a train, locomotive, engine, railroad car, signals or safety
118 device or work equipment or rolling stock;
119 (24) "Serious firearm offense" means a violation of section 29-36, 29-
120 36a or 53-202w, as amended by this act, possession of a stolen firearm or
121 a firearm that is altered in a manner that renders the firearm unlawful,
122 or any crime of which an essential element is that the person discharged,
123 used or was armed with and threatened the use of a firearm; [and]
124 (25) "Serious firearm offender" means a person who has (A) two
125 convictions for a serious firearm offense, (B) a conviction for a serious
126 firearm offense and was previously convicted of a violation of section
127 29-36, 29-36a, subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 53a-217 or
128 subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 53a-217c, or (C) a conviction
129 for a serious firearm offense and was previously convicted of two or
130 more additional felony offenses; and
131 (26) "Major firearm component" means the barrel, slide or cylinder or
132 frame or receiver of a firearm.
133 Sec. 2. Subsection (i) of section 53-206j of the general statutes is
LCO No. 2344 5 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
134 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
135 1, 2026):
136 (i) For purposes of this section, "unfinished frame or lower receiver"
137 means a blank, casting, [or machined body intended to be turned into
138 the frame or lower receiver of a firearm, as defined in section 53a-3, with
139 additional machining, and which has been formed or machined to the
140 point where most major machining operations have been completed to
141 turn the blank, casting or machined body into a frame or lower receiver
142 of a firearm, even if the fire-control cavity area of such blank, casting or
143 machined body is still completely solid and unmachined. An
144 "unfinished frame or lower receiver" is not a firearm, as defined in 18
145 USC 921(a), as amended from time to time] forging, printing, extrusion,
146 machined body or similar item that (1) has reached a stage in
147 manufacture where it may readily be completed, assembled or
148 converted to be used as the frame or receiver of a functional firearm; or
149 (2) is marketed or sold to the public to become or be used as the frame
150 or receiver of a functional firearm once completed, assembled or
151 converted.
152 Sec. 3. Subsection (c) of section 53-206g of the 2026 supplement to the
153 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
154 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
155 (c) For purposes of this section, "firearm" means firearm as defined in
156 section 53a-3, as amended by this act, and "rate of fire enhancement"
157 means any device, component, part, combination of parts, attachment
158 or accessory that: (1) Uses energy from the recoil of a firearm to generate
159 a reciprocating action that causes repeated function of the trigger,
160 including, but not limited to, a bump stock; (2) repeatedly pulls the
161 trigger of a firearm through the use of a crank, lever or other part,
162 including, but not limited to, a trigger crank; [or] (3) causes a
163 semiautomatic firearm to fire more than one round per operation of the
164 trigger, where the trigger pull and reset constitute a single operation of
165 the trigger, including, but not limited to, a binary trigger system; (4)
LCO No. 2344 6 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
166 includes a trigger that forcibly resets into the firing position after each
167 round is fired, such as a forced reset trigger; (5) applies force to a
168 firearm's trigger bar to prevent the trigger bar from limiting the firearm
169 to firing only one round each time the trigger is depressed, such as an
170 auto-sear; or (6) is unnecessary for the function of a firearm and that,
171 when built into, installed in or attached to a firearm, increases the rate
172 of fire above the rate at which a person could otherwise fire such
173 firearm.
174 Sec. 4. Section 53-202w of the general statutes is repealed and the
175 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
176 (a) As used in this section and section 53-202x:
177 (1) "Large capacity magazine" means any firearm magazine, belt,
178 drum, feed strip or similar device that has the capacity of, or can be
179 readily restored or converted to accept, more than ten rounds of
180 ammunition, but does not include: (A) A feeding device that has been
181 permanently altered so that it cannot accommodate more than ten
182 rounds of ammunition, (B) a .22 caliber tube ammunition feeding
183 device, (C) a tubular magazine that is contained in a lever-action
184 firearm, or (D) a magazine that is permanently inoperable;
185 (2) "Lawfully possesses", with respect to a large capacity magazine,
186 means that a person has (A) actual and lawful possession of the large
187 capacity magazine, (B) constructive possession of the large capacity
188 magazine pursuant to a lawful purchase of a firearm that contains a
189 large capacity magazine that was transacted prior to or on April 4, 2013,
190 regardless of whether the firearm was delivered to the purchaser prior
191 to or on April 4, 2013, which lawful purchase is evidenced by a writing
192 sufficient to indicate that (i) a contract for sale was made between the
193 parties prior to or on April 4, 2013, for the purchase of the firearm, or (ii)
194 full or partial payment for the firearm was made by the purchaser to the
195 seller of the firearm prior to or on April 4, 2013, or (C) actual possession
196 under subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, or constructive possession
LCO No. 2344 7 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
197 under subparagraph (B) of this subdivision, as evidenced by a written
198 statement made under penalty of false statement on such form as the
199 Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection prescribes;
200 and
201 (3) "Licensed gun dealer" means a person who has a federal firearms
202 license and a permit to sell firearms pursuant to section 29-28.
203 (b) Except as provided in this section, on and after April 5, 2013, any
204 person who, within this state, distributes, imports into this state, keeps
205 for sale, offers or exposes for sale, or purchases a large capacity
206 magazine shall be guilty of a class D felony. On and after April 5, 2013,
207 any person who, within this state, transfers a large capacity magazine,
208 except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, shall be guilty of a
209 class D felony.
210 (c) Except as provided in this section and section 53-202x, any person
211 who possesses a large capacity magazine shall be guilty of a (1) class D
212 felony if such person is ineligible to possess a firearm under state or
213 federal law, or (2) class A misdemeanor if such person is not ineligible
214 to possess a firearm under state or federal law.
215 (d) A large capacity magazine may be possessed, purchased or
216 imported by:
217 (1) The Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
218 police departments, the Department of Correction, the Division of
219 Criminal Justice, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of
220 Energy and Environmental Protection or the military or naval forces of
221 this state or of the United States;
222 (2) A sworn and duly certified member of an organized police
223 department, the Division of State Police within the Department of
224 Emergency Services and Public Protection or the Department of
225 Correction, a chief inspector or inspector in the Division of Criminal
226 Justice, a salaried inspector of motor vehicles designated by the
LCO No. 2344 8 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
227 Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, a conservation officer or special
228 conservation officer appointed by the Commissioner of Energy and
229 Environmental Protection pursuant to section 26-5, or a constable who
230 is certified by the Police Officer Standards and Training Council and
231 appointed by the chief executive authority of a town, city or borough to
232 perform criminal law enforcement duties, for use by such sworn
233 member, inspector, officer or constable in the discharge of such sworn
234 member's, inspector's, officer's or constable's official duties or when off
235 duty;
236 (3) A member of the military or naval forces of this state or of the
237 United States;
238 (4) A nuclear facility licensed by the United States Nuclear
239 Regulatory Commission for the purpose of providing security services
240 at such facility, or any contractor or subcontractor of such facility for the
241 purpose of providing security services at such facility;
242 (5) Any person who is sworn and acts as a policeman on behalf of an
243 armored car service pursuant to section 29-20 in the discharge of such
244 person's official duties; or
245 (6) Any person, firm or corporation engaged in the business of
246 manufacturing large capacity magazines in this state that manufactures,
247 purchases, tests or transports large capacity magazines in this state for
248 sale within this state to persons specified in subdivisions (1) to (5),
249 inclusive, of this subsection or for sale outside this state, or a federally-
250 licensed firearm manufacturer engaged in the business of
251 manufacturing firearms or large capacity magazines in this state that
252 manufactures, purchases, tests or transports firearms or large capacity
253 magazines in this state for sale within this state to persons specified in
254 subdivisions (1) to (5), inclusive, of this subsection or for sale outside
255 this state.
256 (e) A large capacity magazine may be possessed by:
LCO No. 2344 9 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
257 (1) A licensed gun dealer;
258 (2) A gunsmith who is in a licensed gun dealer's employ, who
259 possesses such large capacity magazine for the purpose of servicing or
260 repairing a lawfully possessed large capacity magazine;
261 (3) A person, firm, corporation or federally-licensed firearm
262 manufacturer described in subdivision (6) of subsection (d) of this
263 section that possesses a large capacity magazine that is lawfully
264 possessed by another person for the purpose of servicing or repairing
265 the large capacity magazine;
266 (4) Any person who has declared possession of the magazine
267 pursuant to section 53-202x; or
268 (5) Any person who is the executor or administrator of an estate that
269 includes a large capacity magazine, or the trustee of a trust that includes
270 a large capacity magazine, the possession of which has been declared to
271 the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection pursuant
272 to section 53-202x, which is disposed of as authorized by the Probate
273 Court, if the disposition is otherwise permitted by this section and
274 section 53-202x.
275 (f) Subsection (b) of this section shall not prohibit:
276 (1) The transfer of a large capacity magazine, the possession of which
277 has been declared to the Department of Emergency Services and Public
278 Protection pursuant to section 53-202x, by bequest or intestate
279 succession, or, upon the death of a testator or settlor: (A) To a trust, or
280 (B) from a trust to a beneficiary;
281 (2) The transfer of a large capacity magazine to a police department
282 or the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection;
283 (3) The transfer of a large capacity magazine to a licensed gun dealer
284 in accordance with section 53-202x; [or]
LCO No. 2344 10 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
285 (4) The transfer of a large capacity magazine prior to October 1, 2013,
286 from a licensed gun dealer, pawnbroker licensed under section 21-40, or
287 consignment shop operator, as defined in section 21-39a, to any person
288 who (A) possessed the large capacity magazine prior to or on April 4,
289 2013, (B) placed a firearm that such person legally possessed, with the
290 large capacity magazine included or attached, in the possession of such
291 dealer, pawnbroker or operator prior to or on April 4, 2013, pursuant to
292 an agreement between such person and such dealer, pawnbroker or
293 operator for the sale of the firearm to a third person, and (C) is eligible
294 to possess the firearm on the date of such transfer; or
295 (5) The transfer of a large capacity magazine within this state between
296 any of the persons specified in subdivisions (1) to (5), inclusive, of
297 subsection (e) of this section.
298 (g) The court may order suspension of prosecution in addition to any
299 other diversionary programs available to the defendant, if the court
300 finds that a violation of this section is not of a serious nature and that
301 the person charged with such violation (1) will probably not offend in
302 the future, (2) has not previously been convicted of a violation of this
303 section, and (3) has not previously had a prosecution under this section
304 suspended pursuant to this subsection, it may order suspension of
305 prosecution in accordance with the provisions of subsection (i) of section
306 29-33.
307 Sec. 5. Section 53-202d of the general statutes is repealed and the
308 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
309 (a) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision,
310 any person who lawfully possesses an assault weapon, as defined in
311 subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of section 53-202a, prior to October
312 1, 1993, shall apply by October 1, 1994, or, if such person is a member of
313 the military or naval forces of this state or of the United States and is
314 unable to apply by October 1, 1994, because such member is or was on
315 official duty outside of this state, shall apply within ninety days of
LCO No. 2344 11 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
316 returning to the state to the Department of Emergency Services and
317 Public Protection, for a certificate of possession with respect to such
318 assault weapon.
319 (B) No person who lawfully possesses an assault weapon pursuant to
320 subdivision (1), (2) or (4) of subsection (b) of section 53-202c shall be
321 required to obtain a certificate of possession pursuant to this subdivision
322 with respect to an assault weapon used for official duties, except that
323 any person described in subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section 53-
324 202c who purchases an assault weapon, as defined in subparagraph (A)
325 of subdivision (1) of section 53-202a, for use in the discharge of official
326 duties who retires or is otherwise separated from service shall apply
327 within ninety days of such retirement or separation from service to the
328 Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection for a
329 certificate of possession with respect to such assault weapon.
330 (2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision,
331 any person who lawfully possesses an assault weapon, as defined in any
332 provision of subparagraphs (B) to (F), inclusive, of subdivision (1) of
333 section 53-202a, on April 4, 2013, under the provisions of sections 53-
334 202a to 53-202k, inclusive, in effect on January 1, 2013, or any person
335 who regains possession of an assault weapon as defined in any
336 provision of said subparagraphs pursuant to subsection (e) of section
337 53-202f, or any person who lawfully purchases a firearm on or after
338 April 4, 2013, but prior to June 18, 2013, that meets the criteria set forth
339 in subdivision (3) or (4) of subsection (a) of section 53-202a of the general
340 statutes, revision of 1958, revised to January 1, 2013, shall apply by
341 January 1, 2014, or, if such person is a member of the military or naval
342 forces of this state or of the United States and is unable to apply by
343 January 1, 2014, because such member is or was on official duty outside
344 of this state, shall apply within ninety days of returning to the state to
345 the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection for a
346 certificate of possession with respect to such assault weapon. Any
347 person who lawfully purchases a semiautomatic pistol that is defined as
348 an assault weapon in any provision of subparagraphs (B) to (F),
LCO No. 2344 12 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
349 inclusive, of subdivision (1) of section 53-202a that the Commissioner of
350 Emergency Services and Public Protection designates as being designed
351 expressly for use in target shooting events at the Olympic games
352 sponsored by the International Olympic Committee pursuant to
353 regulations adopted under subdivision (4) of subsection (b) of section
354 53-202b shall apply within ninety days of such purchase to the
355 Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection for a
356 certificate of possession with respect to such assault weapon.
357 (B) No person who lawfully possesses an assault weapon pursuant to
358 subdivision (1), (2) or (4) of subsection (b) of section 53-202c shall be
359 required to obtain a certificate of possession pursuant to this subdivision
360 with respect to an assault weapon used for official duties, except that
361 any person described in subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section 53-
362 202c who purchases an assault weapon, as defined in any provision of
363 subparagraphs (B) to (F), inclusive, of subdivision (1) of section 53-202a
364 for use in the discharge of official duties who retires or is otherwise
365 separated from service shall apply within ninety days of such retirement
366 or separation from service to the Department of Emergency Services and
367 Public Protection for a certificate of possession with respect to such
368 assault weapon.
369 (3) Any person who obtained a certificate of possession for an assault
370 weapon, as defined in subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of section 53-
371 202a, prior to April 5, 2013, that is defined as an assault weapon
372 pursuant to any provision of subparagraphs (B) to (F), inclusive, of
373 subdivision (1) of section 53-202a shall be deemed to have obtained a
374 certificate of possession for such assault weapon for the purposes of
375 sections 53-202a to 53-202k, inclusive, and shall not be required to obtain
376 a subsequent certificate of possession for such assault weapon.
377 (4) (A) Except as provided in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of this
378 subdivision, any person who lawfully possesses a 2023 assault weapon
379 on June 5, 2023, under the provisions of sections 53-202a to 53-202k,
380 inclusive, in effect on January 1, 2023, or any person who regains
LCO No. 2344 13 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
381 possession of a 2023 assault weapon pursuant to subdivision (2) of
382 subsection (e) of section 53-202f, shall apply by May 1, 2024, or, if such
383 person is a member of the military or naval forces of this state or of the
384 United States and is unable to apply by May 1, 2024, because such
385 member is or was on official duty outside of this state, shall apply within
386 ninety days of returning to the state to the Department of Emergency
387 Services and Public Protection for a certificate of possession with respect
388 to such assault weapon. The Department of Emergency Services and
389 Public Protection shall accept applications both in paper and electronic
390 form, to the extent practicable, and shall not require such applications
391 be notarized.
392 (B) No person who lawfully possesses an assault weapon pursuant to
393 subdivision (1), (2) or (4) of subsection (b) of section 53-202c shall be
394 required to obtain a certificate of possession pursuant to this subdivision
395 with respect to an assault weapon used for official duties, except that
396 any person described in subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section 53-
397 202c who purchases a 2023 assault weapon for use in the discharge of
398 official duties who retires or is otherwise separated from service shall
399 apply within ninety days of such retirement or separation from service
400 to the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection for a
401 certificate of possession with respect to such assault weapon.
402 (C) Any person who lawfully possesses a 2023 assault weapon
403 pursuant to the provisions of subsection (f) of section 53-202c and whose
404 Form 1 application to the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and
405 Explosives has not yet been processed may, instead of following the
406 procedure specified in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, apply by
407 May 1, 2024, to the Department of Emergency Services and Public
408 Protection for a temporary certificate of possession with respect to such
409 assault weapon. Such temporary certificate of possession shall expire on
410 the earlier of January 1, 2027, and the date seven days succeeding a
411 denial of the Form 1 application. When the Form 1 application is
412 approved with respect to such assault weapon, such person may apply
413 to the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection to
LCO No. 2344 14 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
414 convert such temporary certificate of possession into a certificate of
415 possession with respect to such assault weapon. If a complete
416 application to convert is received, the Commissioner of Emergency
417 Services and Public Protection shall approve the application. For the
418 purposes of this subparagraph, a full and complete Form 1 application
419 submitted to the Department of Emergency Services and Public
420 Protection in a form and manner determined by the department shall be
421 sufficient to constitute a complete application for a temporary certificate
422 of possession, and a copy of the notice that a Form 1 application has
423 been approved shall constitute a complete application to convert a
424 temporary certificate of possession into a certificate of possession. The
425 Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection shall accept
426 applications under this subparagraph both in paper and electronic form,
427 to the extent practicable, and shall not require such applications to be
428 notarized.
429 (5) Any person who obtained a certificate of possession for an assault
430 weapon, as defined in any provision of subparagraphs (A) to (F),
431 inclusive, of subdivision (1) of section 53-202a prior to June 6, 2023, that
432 is also a 2023 assault weapon shall be deemed to have obtained a
433 certificate of possession for such assault weapon for the purposes of
434 sections 53-202a to 53-202k, inclusive, and shall not be required to obtain
435 a subsequent certificate of possession for such assault weapon.
436 (6) The certificate of possession shall contain a description of the
437 firearm that identifies it uniquely, including all identification marks, the
438 full name, address, date of birth and thumbprint of the owner, and any
439 other information as the department may deem appropriate.
440 (7) The department shall adopt regulations, in accordance with the
441 provisions of chapter 54, to establish procedures with respect to the
442 application for and issuance of certificates of possession pursuant to this
443 section. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 1-210 and 1-211, the
444 name and address of a person issued a certificate of possession shall be
445 confidential and shall not be disclosed, except such records may be
LCO No. 2344 15 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
446 disclosed to (A) law enforcement agencies and employees of the United
447 States Probation Office acting in the performance of their duties and
448 parole officers within the Department of Correction acting in the
449 performance of their duties, and (B) the Commissioner of Mental Health
450 and Addiction Services to carry out the provisions of subsection (c) of
451 section 17a-500.
452 (b) (1) No assault weapon, as defined in subparagraph (A) of
453 subdivision (1) of section 53-202a, possessed pursuant to a certificate of
454 possession issued under this section may be sold or transferred on or
455 after January 1, 1994, to any person within this state other than to a
456 licensed gun dealer, as defined in subsection (f) of section 53-202f, or as
457 provided in section 53-202e, or as provided in subsection (g) of section
458 53-202f, as amended by this act, or by bequest or intestate succession, or,
459 upon the death of a testator or settlor: (A) To a trust, or (B) from a trust
460 to a beneficiary who is eligible to possess the assault weapon.
461 (2) No assault weapon, as defined in any provision of subparagraphs
462 (B) to (F), inclusive, of subdivision (1) of section 53-202a, possessed
463 pursuant to a certificate of possession issued under this section may be
464 sold or transferred on or after April 5, 2013, to any person within this
465 state other than to a licensed gun dealer, as defined in subsection (f) of
466 section 53-202f, or as provided in section 53-202e, or as provided in
467 subsection (g) of section 53-202f, as amended by this act, or by bequest
468 or intestate succession, or, upon the death of a testator or settlor: (A) To
469 a trust, or (B) from a trust to a beneficiary who is eligible to possess the
470 assault weapon.
471 (3) No 2023 assault weapon possessed pursuant to a certificate of
472 possession issued under this section may be sold or transferred on or
473 after June 6, 2023, to any person within this state other than to a licensed
474 gun dealer, or as provided in section 53-202e, or as provided in
475 subsection (g) of section 53-202f, as amended by this act, or by bequest
476 or intestate succession, or, upon the death of a testator or settlor: (A) To
477 a trust, or (B) from a trust to a beneficiary who is eligible to possess the
LCO No. 2344 16 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
478 assault weapon.
479 (c) Any person who obtains title to an assault weapon for which a
480 certificate of possession has been issued under this section by (1)
481 transfer pursuant to subsection (g) of section 53-202f, as amended by
482 this act, or (2) bequest or intestate succession shall, within ninety days
483 of obtaining title, apply to the Department of Emergency Services and
484 Public Protection for a certificate of possession as provided in subsection
485 (a) of this section, render the assault weapon permanently inoperable,
486 sell the assault weapon to a licensed gun dealer or remove the assault
487 weapon from the state.
488 (d) Any person who moves into the state in lawful possession of an
489 assault weapon, shall, within ninety days, either render the assault
490 weapon permanently inoperable, sell the assault weapon to a licensed
491 gun dealer or remove the assault weapon from this state, except that any
492 person who is a member of the military or naval forces of this state or of
493 the United States, is in lawful possession of an assault weapon and has
494 been transferred into the state after October 1, 1994, may, within ninety
495 days of arriving in the state, apply to the Department of Emergency
496 Services and Public Protection for a certificate of possession with respect
497 to such assault weapon.
498 (e) If an owner of an assault weapon sells or transfers the assault
499 weapon to a licensed gun dealer, such dealer shall, at the time of
500 delivery of the assault weapon, execute a certificate of transfer and cause
501 the certificate of transfer to be mailed or delivered to the Commissioner
502 of Emergency Services and Public Protection. The certificate of transfer
503 shall contain: (1) The date of sale or transfer; (2) the name and address
504 of the seller or transferor and the licensed gun dealer, their Social
505 Security numbers or motor vehicle operator license numbers, if
506 applicable; (3) the licensed gun dealer's federal firearms license number
507 and seller's permit number; (4) a description of the assault weapon,
508 including the caliber of the assault weapon and its make, model and
509 serial number; and (5) any other information the commissioner
LCO No. 2344 17 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
510 prescribes. The licensed gun dealer shall present such dealer's motor
511 vehicle operator's license or Social Security card, federal firearms license
512 and seller's permit to the seller or transferor for inspection at the time of
513 purchase or transfer. The Commissioner of Emergency Services and
514 Public Protection shall maintain a file of all certificates of transfer at the
515 commissioner's central office.
516 (f) Any person who has been issued a certificate of possession for an
517 assault weapon under this section may possess the assault weapon only
518 under the following conditions:
519 (1) At that person's residence, place of business or other property
520 owned by that person, or on property owned by another person with
521 the owner's express permission;
522 (2) While on the premises of a target range of a public or private club
523 or organization organized for the purpose of practicing shooting at
524 targets;
525 (3) While on a target range which holds a regulatory or business
526 license for the purpose of practicing shooting at that target range;
527 (4) While on the premises of a licensed shooting club;
528 (5) While attending any exhibition, display or educational project
529 which is about firearms and which is sponsored by, conducted under
530 the auspices of, or approved by a law enforcement agency or a
531 nationally or state recognized entity that fosters proficiency in, or
532 promotes education about, firearms;
533 (6) While transporting the assault weapon between any of the places
534 set forth in this subsection, or to any licensed gun dealer, as defined in
535 subsection (f) of section 53-202f, for servicing or repair pursuant to
536 subsection (c) of section 53-202f, or for purposes of a transfer pursuant
537 to subsection (g) of section 53-202f, as amended by this act, provided the
538 assault weapon is transported as required by section 53-202f, as
LCO No. 2344 18 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
539 amended by this act;
540 (7) With respect to a nonresident of this state, while transporting a
541 semiautomatic pistol that is defined as an assault weapon in any
542 provision of subparagraphs (B) to (F), inclusive, of subdivision (1) of
543 section 53-202a that the Commissioner of Emergency Services and
544 Public Protection designates as being designed expressly for use in
545 target shooting events at the Olympic games sponsored by the
546 International Olympic Committee pursuant to regulations adopted
547 under subdivision (4) of subsection (b) of section 53-202b, into or
548 through this state in order to attend any exhibition, display or
549 educational project described in subdivision (5) of this subsection, or to
550 participate in a collegiate, Olympic or target pistol shooting competition
551 in this state which is sponsored by, conducted under the auspices of, or
552 approved by a law enforcement agency or a nationally or state
553 recognized entity that fosters proficiency in, or promotes education
554 about, firearms, provided (A) such pistol is transported into or through
555 this state not more than forty-eight hours prior to or after such
556 exhibition, display, project or competition, (B) such pistol is unloaded
557 and carried in a locked carrying case and the ammunition for such pistol
558 is carried in a separate locked container, (C) such nonresident has not
559 been convicted of a felony in this state or of an offense in another state
560 that would constitute a felony if committed in this state, and (D) such
561 nonresident has in his or her possession a pistol permit or firearms
562 registration card if such permit or card is required for possession of such
563 pistol under the laws of his or her state of residence.
564 Sec. 6. Section 53-202f of the general statutes is amended by adding
565 subsection (g) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
566 (NEW) (g) (1) Any licensed gun dealer, as defined in subsection (f) of
567 this section, may take possession of any assault weapon from any
568 person to whom has been issued a certificate of possession for such
569 weapon pursuant to sections 53-202a to 53-202k, inclusive, for purposes
570 of transferring such assault weapon to another person pursuant to
LCO No. 2344 19 of 20

Raised Bill No. 5436
571 subdivision (2) of this subsection.
572 (2) Any licensed gun dealer may transfer possession of any assault
573 weapon received pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection to a
574 person who lawfully possesses another assault weapon and to whom
575 has previously been issued a certificate of possession for such weapon
576 pursuant to sections 53-202a to 53-202k, inclusive.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 53a-3
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 53-206j(i)
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 53-206g(c)
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 53-202w
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026 53-202d
Sec. 6 July 1, 2026 53-202f(g)